Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1810.05
Therapeutic diet, defined.

Therapeutic diet means a diet intervention prescribed by a physician or other health care professional that provides food or nutrients via oral, enteral, or parenteral routes as part of the treatment of a disease or diagnosed clinical condition to modify, eliminate, decrease, or increase identified micronutrients or macronutrients in the diet or to provide mechanically altered food when indicated.

Laws 2023, LB227, § 40.